Illinois, session 104th, SB3045.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Healthcare and Family 5Services Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2205-45 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2205/2205-45 new)8    Sec. 2205-45. Pilot program; cholestatic liver disorders 9in women. 10    (a) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 11conduct a statewide one-year pilot program that studies the 12prevalence of cholestatic liver disorders associated with 13increased risk of end-stage liver disease among women ages 35 14through 64 who are recipients of medical assistance under 15Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code. During the pilot 16program, the Department shall collect the following 17information on study participants:18        (1) Key demographics such as age, genetic 19    predispositions, pre-existing conditions (such as, but not 20    limited to, autoimmune diseases and metabolic disorders) 21    and lifestyle factors that elevate the risk of developing 22    cholestatic liver disorders.23        (2) The number or percentage of study participants   SB3045- 2 -LRB104 17643 KTG 31074 b1    who, despite being identified as high-risk, do not follow 2    through with referrals or treatment recommendations.3        (3) The number of study participants who avoid 4    referral and follow-up care or engage in treatment 5    avoidance.6        (4) Other relevant information or issues identified by 7    the Department. 8    (b) At the end of the one-year pilot program, the 9Department shall review the collected data and information and 10compile it into a written report that includes:11        (1) Recommendations on how to (i) increase awareness 12    of cholestatic liver disorders, including screenings and 13    genetic testing, and (ii) collaborate with patient 14    advocacy groups to raise public awareness through social 15    media, seminars, and community outreach initiatives.16        (2) An analysis of strategies and funding to increase 17    screening and genetic testing for cholestatic liver 18    disorders. The analysis must include recommendations on 19    how to promote public-private partnerships to ensure 20    sustainable funding for genetic research and testing 21    infrastructure.22    All information collected and reported shall be handled in 23accordance with all applicable State and federal privacy laws 24and regulations.25    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 26submit the report to the General Assembly no later than   SB3045- 3 -LRB104 17643 KTG 31074 b1December 31, 2028.  2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.